California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(1) By issuing a citation to the operator, as defined by Section 18603 of the Health and Safety Code. In the event of a violation that constitutes a significant or immediate danger to the health and safety of the customers, the citation shall be issued immediately and served upon the responsible person or the holder of the permit to operate the distribution system. The operator shall be responsible for the correction of any violations for which a citation has been given pursuant to this subdivision.

(2) Service of the citation shall be effected either personally or by first-class mail. Each citation shall be in writing and shall describe with particularity the nature of the violation, including a reference to the statutory provisions or regulations alleged to have been violated, as well as any penalty provided by law for failure to make a timely correction. The citation shall fix the earliest feasible time, as determined by the commission, for the elimination of the condition constituting the alleged violation.

(3) A distribution system operator may request an informal conference with the commission staff to challenge any citation alleging a violation, or any directive to correct a violation. The informal conference, any subsequent hearings, or appeals of a decision of the commission shall be conducted in accordance with the rules and procedures prescribed by the commission.

(c) The remedies provided by this chapter are cumulative and shall not be construed to supersede other provisions of law providing sanctions for violators of this chapter, including, but not limited to, Sections 2112 and 2113.

(d) Nothing in this chapter affects the tort liability of the operator of a distribution system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 388, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4458.

(a) The commission shall establish a surcharge to be paid by operators with distribution systems subject to this chapter on propane purchased for distribution to their customers. The surcharge shall be designed to partially recover the commission’s costs of the propane safety inspection and enforcement program required by this chapter, and to partially recover the commission’s costs of collecting and administering the surcharge. The commission shall collect the surcharge from the operators and deposit it into the Propane Safety Inspection and Enforcement Program Trust Fund, for transfer to the commission’s Utilities Reimbursement Account in the General Fund, which shall be used, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for purposes of Chapter 4.1 (commencing with Section 4451) of Division 2 of the Public Utilities Code. The surcharge shall be assessed on a per space or lot basis, shall not exceed twenty-five cents ($0.25) per month, and shall be collected by the commission on an annual basis.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or local ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure, the operator shall be entitled to recover the surcharge collected pursuant to subdivision (a) from its customers. However, the charge to any customer, to allow for the operator’s recovery, shall not exceed the actual surcharge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 70.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4459.

The commission may adopt rules and orders to carry out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 388, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4460.

(a) In each distribution system, the operator shall post on the premises the current emergency telephone numbers for, at a minimum, the operator, the supplier, the fire department, and the responsible person as defined by Section 18603 of the Health and Safety Code, and shall maintain on the premises a copy of the emergency procedures that shall be used in the event there is a propane leak or other safety hazard in the distribution system. The operator shall inform each of the customers of the location of these emergency telephone numbers and the emergency procedure.

(b) Any operator who fails to comply with subdivision (a) shall be subject to the same penalty set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 4457. The commission shall enforce this subdivision pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4457.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 148.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4461.

Prior to January 1, 1996, the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board shall adopt by reference the 1992 edition of NFPA 58 Standard for the Storage and Handling of Liquified Petroleum Gasses, or as that 1992 edition may be subsequently amended or supplemented. It is the intent of the Legislature that the NFPA 58 Standard supersede any inconsistent state standards, including, but not limited to, Sections 470 to 494, inclusive, of Chapter 4 of Title 8 of the California Administrative Code. Nothing in this section prohibits the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board from adopting more stringent standards than those in NFPA 58.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 388, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4462.

(a) This chapter hereby creates a trust fund known as the propane safety inspection and enforcement program trust fund. The trust fund shall be administered by the commission.

(b) The trust fund shall be used to partially support the funding requirements of the propane safety inspection and enforcement program of the commission pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 651, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4463.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this chapter, as added by Chapter 388 of the Statutes of 1994, shall not be implemented unless sufficient federal funding has been annually appropriated to the Public Utilities Commission to ensure that only those charges specifically fixed by law, and no additional charges shall, directly or indirectly, be passed on to California consumers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 651, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4464.

(a) The commission in administering the trust fund, shall be responsible for the identification of the pertinent operators and for the collection of the surcharges from the operators.

(b) The commission may use a balancing account, in conjunction with the trust fund, to account for any overcollection or undercollection on a yearly basis.

(c) The commission’s administrative responsibility and surcharge collection shall exempt all propane used by the following:

(1) Agricultural, commercial serving less than 10 customers unless a portion of the system is located in a public place, industrial, and refinery systems.

(2) Recreational vehicles and appliances.

(3) Vehicular fuel.

(4) Single customers served by single tanks.

(5) Distribution systems, other than mobilehome parks, which serve less than 10 customers, unless a portion of the system is located in a public place.

(6) Cylinder exchange operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 651, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4465.

(a) If any operator subject to this chapter is in default of the payment of the surcharge required by this chapter for a period of 30 days or more, the commission may estimate from all available information the appropriate fee and may add to the amount of the estimated fee a penalty not to exceed 25 percent of the amount on account of the failure, refusal, or neglect to pay the fee, and the operator shall be estopped to complain of the amount of the commission’s estimate.

(b) The commission may bring an action, in its own name or in the name of the people of the state, in any court of competent jurisdiction, for the collection of delinquent fees estimated under subdivision (a) of this section, together with a penalty of 25 percent for the delinquency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 651, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Charter-Party Carriers of Passengers [5351. - 5450.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions [5351. - 5363.]

5351.

This chapter may be cited as the “Passenger Charter-party Carriers’ Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2146.)
-------------------------------------------

5352.

(a) The use of the public highways for the transportation of passengers for compensation is a business affected with a public interest. It is the purpose of this chapter to preserve for the public full benefit and use of public highways consistent with the needs of commerce without unnecessary congestion or wear and tear upon the highways; to secure to the people adequate and dependable transportation by carriers operating upon the highways; to secure full and unrestricted flow of traffic by motor carriers over the highways which will adequately meet reasonable public demands by providing for the regulation of all transportation agencies with respect to accident indemnity so that adequate and dependable
 service by all necessary transportation agencies shall be maintained and the full use of the highways preserved to the public; and to promote carrier and public safety through its safety enforcement regulations.

(b) To achieve the purposes of subdivision (a) the commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Prioritize the timely processing of applications and hold “application workshops” for potential applicants around the state.

(2) Enable electronic filing of applications, reports, and fee payments.

(3) Dedicate staff to answering telephone calls, mailings, and electronic inquiries from carriers.

(4) Prioritize the timely processing of consumer complaints.

(5) Implement electronic case tracking of complaints and their disposition.

(6) Implement a process for appropriate and timely enforcement against illegally operating carriers, including by performing staff-driven investigations and performing enforcement through sting operations and other forms of presence in the field.

(7) Maintain relationships with, and implement outreach and education programs to, local law enforcement, district attorneys, and airports, and coordinate with law enforcement
 agencies pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1046, subdivision (d) of Section 5317.5, and subdivision (d) of Section 5417.5.

(8) Meet with carrier trade associations at least annually.

(9) Implement a consolidated case tracking system that integrates each of the transportation program core functions and data collection, administrative compliance details, complaints, and investigations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 718, Sec. 7.   (SB 541)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5353.

This chapter does not apply to any of the following:

(a) Transportation service rendered wholly within the corporate limits of a single city or city and county and licensed or regulated by ordinance.

(b) Transportation of school pupils conducted by or under contract with the governing board of any school district entered into pursuant to the Education Code.

(c) Common carrier transportation services between fixed termini or over a regular route that are subject to authorization pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1031) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 1.

(d) Transportation services occasionally afforded for farm employees moving to and from farms on which employed when the transportation is performed by the employer in an owned or leased vehicle, or by a nonprofit agricultural cooperative association organized and acting within the scope of its powers under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 54001) of Division 20 of the Food and Agricultural Code, and without any requirement for the payment of compensation therefor by the employees.

(e) Transportation service rendered by a publicly owned transit system.

(f) Passenger vehicles carrying passengers on a noncommercial enterprise basis.

(g) Taxicab transportation service licensed and regulated by a city or county, by ordinance or resolution, rendered in vehicles designed for carrying not more than eight persons excluding the driver.

(h) Transportation of persons between home and work locations or of persons having a common work-related trip purpose in a vehicle having a seating capacity of 15 passengers or less, including the driver, which are used for the purpose of ridesharing, as defined in Section 522 of the Vehicle Code, when the ridesharing is incidental to another purpose of the driver. This exemption also applies to a vehicle having a seating capacity of more than 15 passengers if the driver files with the commission evidence of liability insurance protection in the same amount and in the same manner as required for a passenger stage corporation, and the vehicle undergoes and passes an annual safety inspection by the Department of the California Highway Patrol. The insurance filing shall be accompanied by a one-time filing fee of seventy-five dollars ($75). This exemption does not apply if the primary purpose for the transportation of those persons is to make a profit. “Profit,” as used in this subdivision, does not include the recovery of the actual costs incurred in owning and operating a vanpool vehicle, as defined in Section 668 of the Vehicle Code.

(i) Vehicles used exclusively to provide medical transportation, including vehicles employed to transport developmentally disabled persons for regional centers established pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4620) of Division 4.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(j) Transportation services rendered solely within the Lake Tahoe Basin, comprising that area included within the Tahoe Regional Planning Compact as set forth in Section 66801 of the Government Code, when the operator of the services has obtained any permit required from the Tahoe Basin Transportation Authority or the City of South Lake Tahoe, or both.

(k) Subject to Section 34507.6 of the Vehicle Code, transportation service provided by the operator of an automobile rental business in vehicles owned or leased by that operator, without charge other than as may be included in the automobile rental charges, to carry its customers to or from its office or facility where rental vehicles are furnished or returned after the rental period.

(l) Subject to Section 34507.6 of the Vehicle Code, transportation service provided by the operator of a hotel, motel, or other place of temporary lodging in vehicles owned or leased by that operator, without charge other than as may be included in the charges for lodging, between the lodging facility and an air, rail, water, or bus passenger terminal or between the lodging facility and any place of entertainment or commercial attraction, including, but not limited to, facilities providing snow skiing. Nothing in this subdivision authorizes the operator of a hotel, motel, or other place of temporary lodging to provide any round trip sightseeing service without a permit, as required by subdivision (c) of Section 5384.

(m) (1) Transportation of hot air balloon ride passengers in a balloon chase vehicle from the balloon landing site back to the original takeoff site, provided that the balloon ride was conducted by a balloonist who meets all of the following conditions:

(A) Does not fly more than a total of 30 passenger rides for compensation annually.

(B) Does not provide any preflight ground transportation services in their vehicles.

(C) In providing return transportation to the launch site from landing does not drive more than 300 miles annually.

(D) Files with the commission an exemption declaration and proof of vehicle insurance, as prescribed by the commission, certifying that the operator qualifies for the exemption and will maintain minimum insurance on each vehicle of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for injury or death of one person, three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) for injury or death of two or more persons and one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for damage to property.

(2) Nothing in this subdivision authorizes the operator of a commercial balloon operation to provide any round trip sightseeing service without a permit, as required by subdivision (c) of Section 5384.

(n) (1) Transportation services incidental to operation of a youth camp that are provided by either a nonprofit organization that qualifies for tax exemption under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code or an organization that operates an organized camp, as defined in Section 18897 of the Health and Safety Code, serving youth 18 years of age or younger.

(2) Any transportation service described in paragraph (1) shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(A) Register as a private carrier with the commission pursuant to Section 4005.

(B) Participate in a pull notice system for employers of drivers as prescribed in Section 1808.1 of the Vehicle Code.

(C) Ensure compliance with the annual bus terminal inspection required by subdivision (c) of Section 34501 of the Vehicle Code.

(D) Obtain the following minimum amounts of general liability insurance coverage for vehicles that are used to transport youth:

(i) A minimum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) general liability insurance coverage for passenger vehicles designed to carry up to eight passengers. For organized camps, as defined in Section 18897 of the Health and Safety Code, an additional two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) general umbrella policy that covers vehicles.

(ii) A minimum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) general liability insurance coverage for vehicles designed to carry up to 15 passengers. For organized camps, as defined in Section 18897 of the Health and Safety Code, an additional five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) general umbrella policy that covers vehicles.

(iii) A minimum of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) general liability insurance coverage for vehicles designed to carry more than 15 passengers, and an additional three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000) general umbrella liability insurance policy that covers vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 694, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5353.5.

On and after July 1, 1989, this chapter does not apply to transportation service, other than transportation service furnished in a limousine for hire, rendered wholly within the corporate limits of a single city or city and county and licensed or regulated by ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1105, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5354.

In construing and enforcing the provisions of this chapter relating to the prescribed privileges and obligations of the holder of a permit or certificate issued hereunder, the act, omission, or failure of any officer, agent, or employee, or person offering to afford the authorized service with the approval or consent of the permit or certificate holder, is the act, omission, or failure of the permit or certificate holder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

5355.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions and general provisions set forth in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2146.)
-------------------------------------------

5355.5.

(a) “Chartering party” means the person, corporation, or other entity that prearranges with a charter-party carrier of passengers for transportation services.

(b) “Designee” means a person who is 25 years of age or older and who is designated by the chartering party as being the person responsible for compliance with the requirements of Section 5384.1 during the provision of transportation services whenever persons under 21 years of age are to be transported unaccompanied by a parent or legal guardian. If the chartering party is a person and the minor is not accompanied by a parent or legal guardian, the chartering party shall be the designee unless the chartering party identifies
 another person to be the designee and the person so
 designated acknowledges and agrees that he or she is the designee. If there is more than one chartering party for a joint carriage of passengers, each chartering party shall designate a designee who is responsible for compliance with the requirements of Section 5384.1 whenever persons under 21 years of age are to be transported unaccompanied by a parent or legal guardian, and that person shall be the designee only for those passengers provided with transportation services on behalf of that chartering party.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 461, Sec. 2.   (AB 45)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5356.

“Corporation” includes a corporation, a company, an association, and a joint stock association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2146.)
-------------------------------------------

5357.

“Person” includes an individual, a firm, or a copartnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2146.)
-------------------------------------------

5358.

“Public highway” includes every public street, road, or highway in this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2146.)
-------------------------------------------

5359.

(a) “Motor vehicle” means a vehicle which is self-propelled.

(b) “Bus” means a vehicle designed, used, or maintained for carrying more than 10 persons, including the driver, which is used to transport persons for compensation or profit.

(c) “Limousine” means any sedan or sport utility vehicle, of either standard or extended length, with a seating capacity of not more than 10 passengers including the driver, used in the transportation of passengers for hire on a prearranged basis within this state, and includes a modified limousine as defined in
 subdivision (d) of Section 1042.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 718, Sec. 8.   (SB 541)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5360.

Subject to the exclusions of Section 5353, “charter-party carrier of passengers” means every person engaged in the transportation of persons by motor vehicle for compensation, whether in common or contract carriage, over any public highway in this state. “Charter-party carrier of passengers” includes any person, corporation, or other entity engaged in the provision of a hired driver service when a rented motor vehicle is being operated by a hired driver.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 472, Sec. 2.   (AB 2572)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5360.5.

(a) Charter-party carriers of passengers shall operate on a prearranged basis within this state.

(b) For purposes of this section, “prearranged basis” means that the transportation of the prospective passenger was arranged with the carrier by the passenger, or a representative of the passenger, either by written contract or telephone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 828, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5361.

“Modified limousine” means any vehicle that has been modified, altered, or extended in a manner that increases the overall wheelbase of the vehicle, exceeding the original equipment manufacturer’s published wheelbase dimension for the base model and year of the vehicle, in any amount sufficient to accommodate additional passengers with a seating capacity of not more than 10 passengers including the driver, and is used in the transportation of passengers for hire. For purposes of this section, “wheelbase” means the longitudinal distance between the vertical centerlines of the front and rear wheels.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 860, Sec. 3.   (SB 611)   Effective September 30, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5362.

With respect to a motor vehicle used in the transportation of persons for compensation by a charter-party carrier of passengers, “owner” means the corporation or person who is registered with the Department of Motor Vehicles as the owner of the vehicle, or who has a legal right to possession of the vehicle pursuant to a lease or rental agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1093, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

5363.

(a) Any provision of the Public Utilities Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 201) of Division 1) or of this chapter applicable to charter bus transportation that conflicts with the federal Transportation Equity Act for the 21st Century (P.L. 105-178) does not apply to charter bus transportation to the extent of that conflict. If any provision of the Public Utilities Act or of this chapter applicable to charter bus transportation, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is invalid as a result of federal preemption, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.

(b) (1) Except as specified in paragraph (2), as used in this section, “charter bus transportation” means transportation, using a vehicle designed, used, or maintained for carrying more than 10 persons, including the driver, of a group of persons who, pursuant to a common purpose, under a single contract, at a fixed charge for the motor vehicle, have acquired the exclusive use of the motor vehicle to travel together.

(2) If a federal court or agency with the jurisdiction to construe Section 14501(a)(1)(C) of Title 49 of the United States Code determines that additional transportation falls within the meaning of the term “charter bus transportation,” as used in that section, the federal construction of that term shall prevail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 89.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Authorization to Operate as a Charter-Party Carrier of Passengers [5371. - 5379.5.]

5371.

No charter-party carrier of passengers excepting transit districts, transit authorities or cities owning and operating local transit systems themselves or through wholly owned nonprofit corporations shall engage in transportation services made subject to this chapter without first having obtained from the commission a certificate that public convenience and necessity require the operation, except that certain specific transportation services as defined in Section 5384 may be conducted under authority of a permit issued by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 324, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5371.1.

(a) No charter-party carrier of passengers issued a class A certificate subject to this section shall be restricted as to point of origin or destination in the State of California.

(b) Every application for a certificate or permit, or renewal thereof, shall be accompanied by the appropriate fee as specified in Section 5373.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 456, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5371.2.

(a) All holders of certificates issued under this section shall operate from a service area to be determined by the commission. In no case shall this area encompass more than a radius of 125 air miles from the home terminal. The home terminal shall be designated by the applicant. This certificate shall be classified as a class B certificate. This section shall not apply to certificates subject to Section 5371.1.

(b) The restriction on a service area imposed by subdivision (a)
 does not apply to the holder of a class B certificate if that person is providing charter bus transportation as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 5363.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 89.2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5371.3.

A class C certificate holder is one who provides transportation services incidental to commercial balloon operations, commercial river rafting, or skiing. This section does not apply to certificates issued under Section 5371.1 or 5371.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 125, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5371.4.

(a) The governing body of any city, county, or city and county may not impose a fee on charter-party carriers operating limousines. However, the governing body of any city, county, or city and county may impose a business license fee on, and may adopt and enforce any reasonable rules and regulations pertaining to operations within its boundaries for, any charter-party carrier domiciled or maintaining a business office within that city, county, or city and county.

(b) The governing body of any airport may not impose vehicle safety, vehicle licensing, or insurance requirements on charter-party carriers operating limousines that are more burdensome than those imposed by the commission.
 However, the governing board of any airport may require a charter-party carrier operating limousines to obtain an airport permit for operating authority at the airport.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the governing body of any airport may adopt and enforce reasonable and nondiscriminatory local airport rules, regulations, and ordinances pertaining to access, use of streets and roads, parking, traffic control, passenger transfers, trip fees, and occupancy, and the use of buildings and facilities, that are applicable to charter-party carriers operating limousines on airport property.

(d) This section does not apply to any agreement entered into pursuant to Sections 21690.5 to 21690.9, inclusive, between the governing body of an airport and charter-party carriers operating limousines.

(e) The governing
 body of any airport shall not impose a fee based on gross receipts of charter-party carriers operating limousines.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, nothing in this section prohibits a city, county, city and county, or the governing body of any airport, from adopting and enforcing reasonable permit requirements, fees, rules, and regulations applicable to charter-party carriers of passengers other than those operating limousines.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, a city, county, or city and county may impose reasonable rules for the inspection of waybills of charter-party carriers of passengers operating within the jurisdiction of the city, county, or city and county, for purposes of verifying valid prearranged travel.

(h) For the purposes of this section, “limousine”
 includes any sedan or sport utility vehicle, of either standard or extended length, with a seating capacity of not more than 10 passengers including the driver, used in the transportation of passengers for hire on a prearranged basis within this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 842, Sec. 51.   (SB 1222)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5371.5.

(a) Upon receipt of a complaint containing sufficient information to warrant conducting an investigation, the commission shall investigate any business that advertises limousine-for-hire or passenger charter transportation service for compensation in motor vehicles. The commission shall, in a rulemaking or other appropriate procedure, adopt criteria that establishes the type of information, if contained in a complaint, that is sufficient to warrant an investigation. Pursuant to this investigation, the commission shall do all of the
 following:

(1) Determine which businesses, if any, are required to have in effect a passenger charter-party carrier certificate or permit pursuant to Section 5371 but do not have the required certificate or permit.

(2) Inform any business not having a required certificate or permit that it is in violation of law.

(3) Within 60 days of informing the business pursuant to paragraph (2), institute civil or criminal proceedings, or both, pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 5411) or any other applicable law.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “advertises” includes the undertaking of any action described in subdivision (b) of Section 5386.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 701, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5371.6.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that advertising and use of telephone service is essential for charter-party carriers of passengers to obtain business and to conduct intrastate passenger transportation services. Unlawful advertisements by unlicensed charter-party carriers of passengers has resulted in properly licensed and regulated charter-party carriers of passengers competing with unlicensed charter-party carriers of passengers using unfair business practices. Unlicensed charter-party carriers of passengers have also exposed citizens
 of the state to unscrupulous persons who portray themselves as properly licensed, qualified, and insured charter-party carriers of passengers. Many of these unlicensed charter-party carriers of passengers have been found to have operated their vehicles without insurance or in an unsafe manner, placing the citizens of the state at risk.

(b) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that the termination of telephone service utilized by unlicensed charter-party carriers of passengers is essential to ensure the public safety and welfare. Therefore, the commission should take enforcement action as specified in this section to disconnect telephone service of unlicensed charter-party carriers of passengers who unlawfully advertise passenger transportation services in yellow page directories and other publications. The enforcement actions provided for by this section are consistent with the decision of the California Supreme Court in
 Goldin v. Public Utilities Commission (1979) 23 Cal.3d 638.

(2) For purposes of this section, a telephone corporation or telegraph corporation, or a corporation that holds a controlling interest in the telephone or telegraph corporation, or any business that is a subsidiary or affiliate of the telephone or telegraph corporation, that has the name and address of the subscriber to a telephone number being used by an unlicensed charter-party carrier of passengers shall provide the commission, or an authorized officer or employee of the commission, upon demand, and the order of a magistrate, access to this information. A magistrate may only issue an order, for the purposes of this subdivision, if the magistrate has made the findings required by subdivision (c).

(c) A telephone or telegraph corporation shall refuse telephone service to a new subscriber and shall disconnect telephone
 service of an existing subscriber only after it is shown that other available enforcement remedies of the commission have failed to terminate unlawful activities detrimental to the public welfare and safety, and upon receipt from any authorized officer or employee of the commission of a writing, signed by a magistrate, as defined by Sections 807 and 808 of the Penal Code, finding that probable cause exists to believe that the subscriber is advertising or holding out to the public to perform, or is performing, charter-party carrier of passengers transportation services without having in force a permit or certificate issued by the commission authorizing those services, or that the telephone service otherwise is being used or is to be used as an instrumentality, directly or indirectly, to violate or to assist in violation of the laws requiring a charter-party carrier of passengers permit or certificate. Included in the writing of the magistrate shall be a finding that there is probable cause to believe that the
 subject telephone facilities have been or are to be used in the commission or facilitation of holding out to the public to perform, or in performing, charter-party carrier of passengers transportation services without having in force a permit or certificate issued by the commission authorizing those services, and that, absent immediate and summary action, a danger to public welfare or safety will result.

(d) Any person aggrieved by any action taken pursuant to this section shall have the right to file a complaint with the commission and may include therein a request for interim relief. The commission shall schedule a public hearing on the complaint to be held within 21 calendar days of the filing and assignment of a docket number to the complaint. The remedy provided by this section shall be exclusive. No other action at law or in equity shall accrue against any telephone or telegraph corporation because of, or as a result of, any matter or
 thing done or threatened to be done pursuant to this section.

(e) At any hearing held on a complaint filed with the commission pursuant to subdivision (d), the commission staff shall have the right to participate, including the right to present evidence and argument and to present and cross-examine witnesses. The commission staff shall have both the burden of providing that the use made or to be made of the telephone service is to hold out to the public to perform, or to assist in performing, services as a charter-party carrier of passengers, or that the telephone service is being or is to be used as an instrumentality, directly or indirectly, to violate or to assist in violation of the certification or permitting requirements applicable to charter-party carriers of passengers and that the character of the acts are such that, absent immediate and summary action, a danger to public welfare or safety will result, and the burden of persuading the
 commission that the telephone services should be refused or should not be restored.

(f) The telephone or telegraph corporation, immediately upon refusal or disconnection of service in accordance with subdivision (c), shall notify the subscriber in writing that the refusal or disconnection of telephone service has been made pursuant to a request of the commission and the writing of a magistrate, and shall include with the notice a copy of this section, a copy of the writing of the magistrate, and a statement that the customer or subscriber may request information from the commission at its San Francisco or Los Angeles office concerning any provision of this section and the manner in which a complaint may be filed.

(g) The provisions of this section are an implied term of every contract for telephone service. The provisions of this section are a part of any application for telephone
 service. Applicants for, and subscribers and customers of, telephone service have, as a matter of law, consented to the provisions of this section as a consideration for the furnishing of the telephone service.

(h) As used in this section, the terms “person,” “customer,” and “subscriber” include a subscriber to telephone service, any person using the telephone service of a subscriber, an applicant for telephone service, a corporation, as defined in Section 204, a “person” as defined in Section 205, a limited liability company, a partnership, an association, and includes their lessees and assigns.

(i) (1) As used in this section, “telephone corporation” means a “telephone corporation” as defined in Section 234.

(2) As used in this section, “telegraph corporation” means a “telegraph corporation”
 as defined in Section 236.

(j) As used in this section, “authorized officer or employee of the commission” includes the executive director of the commission or any commission employee designated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 830.11 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 701, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)